Utah statutes.
32B-8a-501.   License not to be pledged as security -- Prohibited transfers.

(1)  A retail licensee may not enter into any agreement under which the retail licensee pledges the retail license as security for a loan or as security for the fulfillment of any agreement.

(2)  A retail licensee may not transfer a retail license if the transfer is to:

(a)  satisfy a loan or to fulfill an agreement entered into more than 90 days preceding the date on which the transfer application is filed;

(b)  gain or establish a preference to or for any creditor of the transferor, except as provided by Section 32B-8a-202; or

(c)  defraud or injure a creditor of the transferor.

(3)  A retail licensee may not transfer a retail license except in accordance with this chapter.

